North Carolina, session 2025, SB864.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MODIFY COMPUTER SCIENCE STANDARDS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-81.90 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) Instruction on Artificial Intelligence Literacy. – The State Board shall adopt
age-appropriate standards for instruction on artificial intelligence (AI) literacy for grades
kindergarten through 12. All courses offered pursuant to this section shall include instruction on
AI literacy aligned with the standards adopted by the State Board. Notwithstanding the regular
review of content standards required by G.S. 115C-12(9c)c., the State Board shall review and
update these standards every two years to keep up with advancements in AI. The standards shall
include at least the following:
(1) Responsible and ethical use of AI.
(2) Limitations of AI tools.
(3) Evaluation and verification of outputs provided by AI tools.
(4) Data and privacy concerns related to AI tools.
(5) Best practices and safety when interacting with AI or AI chatbots."
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding the regular review of content standards pursuant
to G.S. 115C-12(9c)c., the State Board of Education shall revise the standard course of study for
computer science for grades kindergarten through 12 to include artificial intelligence literacy in
accordance with G.S. 115C-81.90(a1), as enacted by this section. The State Board shall adopt the
revised standards for implementation beginning with the 2028-2029 school year.
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Department
of Public Instruction, shall update the lists of approved courses required by G.S. 115C-81.90(b)
and (c) to reflect course alignment with the revised computer science standards adopted pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section. The State Board shall update the lists for use beginning with the
2028-2029 school year.
*S864-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) The Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee by December 15, 2028, on the following related to
the adoption of revised computer science standards in accordance with subsection (b) of this
section:
(1) Adoption and implementation of the revised standards.
(2) Alignment of courses on the approved courses lists as updated pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section.
(3) Any difficulties with the implementation of the revised standards.

PART II. PUBLIC SCHOOL UNIT AI POLICIES
SECTION 2.(a) Part 3A of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-102.13. Artificial intelligence policies.
The Department of Public Instruction shall develop a model artificial intelligence (AI) policy
to serve as guidance to public school units when developing their AI policies. At a minimum, the
model policy shall include the following:
(1) A definition of AI, generative AI, and AI tools.
(2) Guidance on how to develop the AI literacy of students and school staff. AI
literacy shall include education about nonconsensual intimate imagery.
(3) Data privacy and security measures to protect students and staff, including
protecting personally identifiable information, when using AI.
(4) Standards of ethical and acceptable use of AI and AI chatbots in an
educational setting, including standards of academic integrity when using AI."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(73) To Adopt an AI Use Policy. – Local boards of education shall adopt a policy
on the use of artificial intelligence by students and staff for educational
purposes after review of the model policy developed by the Department of
Public Instruction pursuant to G.S. 115C-102.13."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(39) To adopt an AI use policy. – The board of trustees shall adopt a policy on the
use of artificial intelligence by students and staff for educational purposes
after review of the model policy developed by the Department of Public
Instruction pursuant to G.S. 115C-102.13."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-218.33 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) A charter school shall adopt a policy on the use of artificial intelligence by students
and staff for educational purposes after review of the model policy developed by the Department
of Public Instruction pursuant to G.S. 115C-102.13."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(18c) To adopt an AI use policy. – The board of directors shall adopt a policy on the
use of artificial intelligence by students and staff for educational purposes
after review of the model policy developed by the Department of Public
Instruction pursuant to G.S. 115C-102.13."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 116-239.8 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(21c) To adopt an AI use policy. – The chancellor shall adopt a policy regarding the
use of artificial intelligence by students and staff for educational purposes
after review of the model policy developed by the Department of Public
Instruction pursuant to G.S. 115C-102.13."
SECTION 2.(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. The Department of
Public Instruction shall develop the model policy required by G.S. 115C-102.13, as enacted by
this section, no later than December 31, 2026. The Superintendent shall ensure that all public
Page 2 Senate Bill 864-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
school units have access to the model policy developed by the Department by no later than
January 15, 2027. Governing bodies of public school units shall adopt the policies required by
subsections (b) through (f) of this section by no later than June 30, 2027.

PART III. AI TOOL EVALUATION FRAMEWORK
SECTION 3.(a) Part 3A of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-102.14. Department responsibilities regarding artificial intelligence tools.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall establish and maintain an evaluation
framework that provides criteria and guiding considerations for evaluating generative artificial
intelligence-powered educational tools (AI tools). The Department shall review and update the
framework at least every two years and update the criteria to reflect changes in technology,
evidence, or educational practice. The framework shall address at least the following:
(1) Student data privacy, security, and transparency.
(2) Alignment with the standard course of study.
(3) Accessibility for all students.
(b) The Department shall maintain a publicly available list of AI tools that have been
reviewed under the framework established in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The Department shall establish procurement guidance, qualified vendor lists, and
other mechanisms to support and incentivize the adoption of AI tools that have been reviewed
under the framework established in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The Department shall maintain a publicly available list of all AI tools being used in
public school units."
SECTION 3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART IV. EDUCATOR AND ADMINISTRATOR TRAINING ON THE USE OF AI
SECTION 4.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall partner with the Friday
Institute for Educational Innovation at North Carolina State University (Friday Institute) to
design, produce, and support implementation of a suite of tool-agnostic online training modules
and related training resources. Modules and resources shall address at least the following:
(1) AI fundamentals for educators, including the following:
a. What AI is and is not.
b. The basics of generative AI.
c. Strengths and limitations of AI as a learning tool.
d. AI "hallucinations," or when AI tools reference information that is
inaccurate or nonexistent.
(2) Responsible instructional use of AI, such as the following:
a. Lesson planning.
b. Differentiated instruction.
c. Student feedback.
d. Productivity workflows and how AI can improve productivity.
e. Appropriate boundaries for AI usage.
(3) Verification and quality control, including the following:
a. Fact-checking information provided by an AI program.
b. Evaluation of sources provided by an AI program.
c. Documenting prompts and outputs from AI programs.
d. Educator accountability for decisions based on input from an AI
program.
(4) Academic integrity and assessment redesign to account for greater student
access to AI tools.
(5) Data privacy and security regarding AI tools.
Senate Bill 864-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Bias in AI systems, including the following:
a. How bias enters into AI systems.
b. The effect of those biases on disparately impacted communities.
c. How to mitigate the effects of bias when using AI tools.
d. Inclusive classroom use.
(7) Accessible usage with special populations, including supports and
differentiation for the following populations:
a. Students with disabilities.
b. Limited English proficient students.
(8) Ethical use and professional responsibility for educators, including the
following:
a. Transparency with students and families about the use of AI tools.
b. Appropriate decision making in the classroom regarding the use of AI
tools.
c. Avoiding overreliance on AI tools.
SECTION 4.(b) The Friday Institute shall produce at least the following:
(1) A suite of self-paced modules that require a minimum of 10 hours of seat time
to complete.
(2) A facilitator guide to be provided to administrators in each public school unit
to help facilitate the professional learning developed pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section.
(3) Model classroom resources to be provided to teachers.
(4) A package to be provided to public school unit professional learning staff to
develop a "train-the-trainer" model within public school units.
SECTION 4.(c) All resources developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
shall be made available to public school units by June 30, 2027, using professional development
platforms and structures currently in use by the Department of Public Instruction.
SECTION 4.(d) All teachers employed by local school administrative units, charter
schools, or laboratory schools shall complete the professional development provided pursuant to
this section by June 30, 2028.
SECTION 4.(e) The Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee by December 15, 2028, on the following:
(1) The number of modules delivered by the Friday Institute and implemented in
public school units.
(2) Educator participation in modules, based on metrics available to the
Department.
(3) Any recommended updates to the professional learning provided pursuant to
this section.
(4) Any additional supports needed for continuing implementation.
SECTION 4.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this section. Funds appropriated in this
act shall not revert but shall remain available until the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 4 Senate Bill 864-First Edition